Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-180
Exclusion of lands; result of vote; order of board.

If at such election a majority of all votes cast shall be against the exclusion of the lands from the district, the board shall deny and dismiss the petition and proceed no further in the matter, but if a majority of such votes shall be in favor of the exclusion of the lands from the district the board shall thereupon order that the lands mentioned in the resolution be excluded from the district. The order shall describe the boundaries of the district, should the exclusion of the lands from the district change the boundaries of the district, and for that purpose the board may cause a survey to be made of such portions of the boundaries as the board may deem necessary.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 53, p. 300;

R.S.1913, § 3510;

C.S.1922, § 2910;

C.S.1929, § 46-155;

R.S.1943, § 46-180.